src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Verb inflection

!! The Moksha language verbs inflect in persons.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ## VERBS 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON AUXILIARIES
ба+Pcle+Aux+Conj:ба ENDLEX ;


LEXICON V_
: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON V-IMPRT-SG_
+Imprt+ScSg2: K ;

!LEXICON V-IMPRT-PL_
!+Imprt+ScPl2: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-CONJ_AFOLJ !!= * @CODE@ аф:афоль
!%^Ь2ZERO
+Neg+Conj+ScSg1:%>%{ЕОØ%}нь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2:%>ихтень ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3:%>ине ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3:%>ине ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg2:%>%{ЕОØ%}ть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg2+Use/NG:%>ить ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1:%>%{ЕОØ%}майть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}масть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg3: ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1:%>%{ЕОØ%}мань ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2:%>%{ЕОØ%}нзе ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}мазь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3:%>%{ЕОØ%}зе ENDLEX ;
+Dial+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3:%>%{Х%}це ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3:%>%{ЕОØ%}зень ENDLEX ;
+Dial+Neg+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3:%>%{Х%}цень ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}ме ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2:%>%{ЕОØ%}дязь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}дязь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3:%>%{ЕОØ%}ськ ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3:%>%{ЕОØ%}ськ ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}де ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1:%>%{ЕОØ%}масть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}масть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3:%>%{ЕОØ%}сть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3:%>%{ЕОØ%}сть ENDLEX ;

+Neg+Conj+ScPl3:%>%{Х%}ть ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3:%>%{ЕОØ%}зь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1:%>%{ЕОØ%}мазь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}мазь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2:%>%{ЕОØ%}дязь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}дязь ENDLEX ;
+Neg+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3:%>%{ЕОØ%}зь ENDLEX ;

!LEXICON V_TUMS
!! тумс:ту
!: V0_KUNDAMS ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! BOTH IV and TV
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON BV_ALYJAFTOMS
 IV_ALYJAFTOMS ;
 TV_ALYJAFTOMS ;

LEXICON BV_KUNDAMS
 TV_KUNDAMS ;
 IV_KUNDAMS ;

LEXICON BV_MUMS
 TV_MUMS ;
 IV_MUMS ;

LEXICON BV_ANDOMS
 TV_ANDOMS ;
 IV_ANDOMS ;

LEXICON BV_SJAVOMS
 TV_SJAVOMS ;
 IV_SJAVOMS ;

LEXICON BV_NJAJEMS
 TV_NJAJEMS ;
 IV_NJAJEMS ;
LEXICON BV_NJAFTEMS
 TV_NJAFTEMS ;
 IV_NJAFTEMS ;
LEXICON BV_PACHKODEMS
 TV_PACHKODEMS ;
 IV_PACHKODEMS ;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! OBJECT and SUBJECT VERBS 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON TV_KUNDAMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@  V0_KUNDAMS ;

LEXICON TV_MUMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@  V0_MUMS ;

LEXICON TV_ANDOMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_ANDOMS ;

LEXICON TV_SJAVOMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_SJAVOMS ;

LEXICON TV_PACHKODEMS
!! пачкодемс:пачкодь
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_PACHKODEMS ;

LEXICON BV_TIJEMS
 TV_TIJEMS ;
: V0_TIJEMS ;
LEXICON TV_TIJEMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_TIJEMS ;

LEXICON TV_NJAJEMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_NJAJEMS ; 

LEXICON BV_NJAFTEMS_SUB
 TV_NJAFTEMS_SUB ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: V0_NJAFTEMS ;
LEXICON TV_NJAFTEMS_SUB
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: TV_NJAFTEMS ;
LEXICON TV_NJAFTEMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_NJAFTEMS ;

LEXICON TV_ALYJAFTOMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V0_ALYJAFTOMS ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! SUBJECT ONLY VERBS 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON IV_KUNDAMS
! кундамс:кунда
: V0_KUNDAMS ;

LEXICON IV_MUMS
! мумс:му
: V0_MUMS ;

LEXICON IV_ANDOMS
!! андомс:анд
: V0_ANDOMS ;

LEXICON IV_SJAVOMS
!! сявомс:сяв
: V0_SJAVOMS ;

LEXICON IV_PACHKODEMS
!! пачкодемс:пачкодь
: V0_PACHKODEMS ;

LEXICON IV_NJAFTEMS
: V0_NJAFTEMS ;

LEXICON IV_ALYJAFTOMS
: V0_ALYJAFTOMS ;

LEXICON IV_ANDOVOMS
!! андовомс:андов
: V0_ANDOMS ;

LEXICON IV_NJAJEMS
!! няемс:ня
: V0_NJAJEMS ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! VERBS MUTUAL FOR TV and IV !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V0_KUNDAMS
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ INF_OM ;! was Non-Finite-Vws 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Non-Finite-Cns ;
V2V-DERIVATION-INITIAL-VOW_0 ;

LEXICON V0_MUMS
!!€gt-norm: MUMS
!!€ мумс: мумс+V+Inf
!!€ муйхтень: мумс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2
!!€ музе: мумс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3
!!€ мусь: мумс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3
!!€ мулезе: мумс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@й VERB-ZERO-SC-REMAINDER ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@ VERB-ZERO-SC-40/50 ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Use/NG+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@й VERB-ZERO-OC2 ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@ VERB-ZERO-OC13 ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
!2018-06-28+Ind+Prs@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@:@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@	 VERB-ZERO-OC13 ; !!= @CODE@ This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Use/NG:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й	 IND-PRT1-SC3 ; !!= @CODE@ This is a difference from ТИЕМС
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@	 IND-PRT1-SC3 ; !!= @CODE@ 
!:	 IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3-ONLY-SC ; 
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@	 IND-PRT1-ALL-BUT-Sc3 ; 

@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@  IND-PRT1-OC-12/13/16/23/26 ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@й  IND-PRT1-OC-REMAINDER ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@	 IND-PRT2-ALL ; 
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.COND@+Cond:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.COND@й%>%{ЕОØ%}ндяря VERB-ZERO-ALL ; !! COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Cond:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{ЕОØ%}ндяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ; !!= @CODE@ 
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.NPROT@+NegCnd:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.NPROT@й%>%{ЕОØ%}фтяря VERB-ZERO-ALL ; !! COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+NegCnd:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{ЕОØ%}фтяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ; !!= @CODE@ 
!12, 13, 16, 23, 26, 
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Use/NG:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й	 CONJ-ALL     	;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@	 CONJ-ALL     	;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й	 DES-ALL     	;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@	 IMPRT-20   	;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й	 IMPRT-ALL-BUT-20   	;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й	 OPT-ALL       	;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@+Use/NG:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@й	 INF_OM		; !муемс
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@	 INF_OM		; !мумс
!+ConNeg:е K ; 
+ConNeg: K ; 
+ConNegII:йхть K ; 
+ConNegII:йхть PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ; 
! VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
!2026-02-16!@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ INF_OM ;! was Non-Finite-Vws 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Non-Finite-Cns ;
:%>%{ЕОØ%} V2V-DERIVATION-INITIAL-VOW_0 ;

LEXICON V0_ANDOMS
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ VERBAL-CONJUGATIONS-ALL ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ INF_OM ;! was Non-Finite-Vws 
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Non-Finite-Cns ;
V2V-DERIVATION-INITIAL-VOW_0 ;

LEXICON VERBNEGATIVE
аф+V+Aux:афоль V-AUX-NEG-CONJ_AFOLJ ;
аф+V+Aux:тяль V-AUX-NEG-CONJ_AFOLJ ;
